Hawaii statutes.
§601-3.5 Supreme court law library
revolving fund. There is established a revolving fund for the statewide
supreme court law library system into which shall be deposited all fines, fees,
and other revenue derived from the system's operations. Moneys deposited in
this fund may be expended to replace or repair lost, damaged, stolen,
unreturned, or outdated books, serials, periodicals, and other library
materials, or to support and improve library services. [L 1990, c 47, §1; am L
1993, c 64, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next